Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1727
Marketing plan; buy-back or security investment provision; invoked; entitlement.

Upon invocation of the buy-back or security investment provision under section 59-1726, the minimum amount a purchaser shall be entitled to have returned to him or her is the full amount of his or her initial payment, less the money actually received by him or her from the operation of the seller-assisted marketing plan. The amount actually received shall be either the amount the purchaser actually obtained from the seller for any product resold to the seller or the amount of money the general public pays for use of the purchaser's product, equipment, supplies, or services, less any amount the purchaser has paid the owner or manager of the location at which the purchaser's products, equipment, supplies, or services are placed.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 27.